Hawaii statutes.
[§489E-9] Attribution and effect of
electronic record and electronic signature. (a) An electronic record or
electronic signature is attributable to a person if it was the act of the
person. The act of the person may be shown in any manner, including a showing
of the efficacy of any security procedure applied to determine the person to
which the electronic record or electronic signature was attributable.

(b) The effect of an electronic record or
electronic signature attributed to a person under subsection (a) is determined
from the context and surrounding circumstances at the time of its creation,
execution, or adoption, including the parties' agreement, if any, and otherwise
as provided by law. [L 2000, c 282, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next